Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-107
Person or other general term, when protection of property intended; meaning.

Whenever any property or interest is intended to be protected by a provision of the penal law, and the general term person or any other general term is used to designate the party whose property is intended to be protected, the provisions of such penal laws and the protection thereby given shall extend to the property of the state, or of any county, and of all public or private corporations.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 252, p. 782;

R.S.1913, § 8907;

C.S.1922, § 9928;

C.S. 1929, § 29-107;

R.S.1943, § 29-107.